South Dakota, session 2026, HB1213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $2,500,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Education, for the purpose of providing grants to school districts and accredited nonpublic
schools as part of a statewide educator retention initiative.
Section 2. The statewide educator retention initiative must employ a comprehensive,
educator-centered approach that uses quantitative and qualitative data to address issues that
impede a school district's guide and measure the impact of actions taken by a school district
or accredited nonpublic school to improve the workplace conditions that have the greatest
impact on educator retention. The Department of Education shall administer and make
available the moneys appropriated for the statewide educator retention initiative, pursuant to
section 1 of this Act, to directly assist to provide grants to school districts and accredited
nonpublic schools in resolving issues that impede educator retention. The department may
partner with a qualified organization or entity to provide the statewide educator retention
initiative that apply to participate in the initiative.
Section 3. Any school district or accredited nonpublic school that is the recipient of a grant
under section 2 of this Act must partner with an entity that has the ability to provide research-
based tools and advisory support to elevate educator voices, reduce educator burnout, and
improve the daily working conditions of educators. The Department of Education shall provide
a list of entities that meet the requirements of this section to any interested school district or
accredited nonpublic school upon request prior to the opening of the application period as
provided in this section.
Section 4. A school district or accredited nonpublic school may apply to participate in the
initiative only during the designated application period beginning September 1, 2026, and
ending on October 31, 2026. If the Department of Education does not obligate all of the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1213D 2 1213
moneys appropriated in section 1 of this Act, before June 30, 2029, the department must
initiate a second application period, beginning on July 1, 2029, and ending on August 31,
2029.
Section 5. The Department of Education shall provide a written report to the Joint Committee
on Appropriations, the House Committee on Education, and the Senate Committee on
Education, on or before February first each year. The report must detail the results of the
initiative in each school district or accredited nonpublic school that received a grant. Upon the
request of the chair of a committee receiving the report, the secretary of the Department of
Education shall make a presentation to the committee and answer any questions that the
committee may have on the contents of the report.
Section 6. The Department of Education shall provide grants for costs associated with
participation in the statewide educator retention initiative, based on applications received
from school districts and accredited nonpublic schools and approved by the Department of
Education during the period beginning on July 1, 2026, and ending on June 30, 2029.The
department may spend up to five percent of the appropriation in section 1 of this Act for costs
incurred in administering the grants.
Section 6. The secretary of the Department of Education shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 7. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 8. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.